apertium-cat.cat.dix
<pardef n="ass/iri__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>íries</l>     <r>iri<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>íria</l>      <r>iri<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>iris</l>      <r>iri<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>iri</l>       <r>iri<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>


<pardef n="b/ifi__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ífies</l>     <r>ifi<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ífia</l>      <r>ifi<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ifis</l>      <r>ifi<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ifi</l>       <r>ifi<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>


<pardef n="cefaloraqu/idi__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ídies</l>     <r>idi<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ídia</l>      <r>idi<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>idis</l>      <r>idi<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>idi</l>       <r>idi<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>


<pardef n="prom/iscu__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>íscues</l>    <r>iscu<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>íscua</l>     <r>iscu<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>iscus</l>     <r>iscu<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>iscu</l>      <r>iscu<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>


<pardef n="consp/icu__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ícues</l>     <r>icu<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ícua</l>      <r>icu<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>icus</l>      <r>icu<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>icu</l>       <r>icu<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>


<pardef n="cor/inti__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ínties</l>    <r>inti<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>íntia</l>     <r>inti<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>intis</l>     <r>inti<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>inti</l>      <r>inti<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>

<pardef n="esp/uri__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>úries</l>     <r>uri<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>úria</l>      <r>uri<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>uris</l>      <r>uri<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>uri</l>       <r>uri<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>

<pardef n="ex/ogen__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ògenes</l>    <r>ogen<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ògena</l>     <r>ogen<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ògens</l>     <r>ogen<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ogen</l>      <r>ogen<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>


<pardef n="herb/aci__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>àcies</l>     <r>aci<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>àcia</l>      <r>aci<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>acis</l>      <r>aci<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>aci</l>       <r>aci<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>

<pardef n="/igni__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ígnies</l>    <r>igni<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ígnia</l>     <r>igni<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ignis</l>     <r>igni<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>igni</l>      <r>igni<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>


<pardef n="p/etri__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ètries</l>    <r>etri<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ètria</l>     <r>etri<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>etris</l>     <r>etri<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>etri</l>      <r>etri<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>


<pardef n="s/erbi__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>èrbies</l>    <r>erbi<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>èrbia</l>     <r>erbi<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>erbis</l>     <r>erbi<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>erbi</l>      <r>erbi<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>


<pardef n="s/iti__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>íties</l>     <r>iti<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ítia</l>      <r>iti<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>itis</l>      <r>iti<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>iti</l>       <r>iti<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>

<pardef n="sup/erflu__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>èrflues</l>   <r>erflu<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>èrflua</l>    <r>erflu<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>erflus</l>    <r>erflu<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>erflu</l>     <r>erflu<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>

<pardef n="taron/ja__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ges</l>       <r>ja<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ja</l>        <r>ja<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>


<pardef n="terr/aqüi__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>àqüies</l>    <r>aqüi<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>àqüia</l>     <r>aqüi<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>aqüis</l>     <r>aqüi<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>aqüi</l>      <r>aqüi<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>

<pardef n="quals/evol__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>sevol</l>     <r>evol<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>evol</l>      <r>evol<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>sevulla</l>   <r>evol<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>evulla</l>    <r>evol<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="monar/ca__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ques</l>      <r>ca<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ca</l>        <r>ca<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="patriar/ca__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ques</l>      <r>ca<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ca</l>        <r>ca<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="addict/e__n">
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="biòl/eg__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ogues</l>     <r>eg<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>oga</l>       <r>eg<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>egs</l>       <r>eg<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>eg</l>        <r>eg<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="s/erbi__n">
  <e>       <p><l>èrbies</l>    <r>erbi<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>èrbia</l>     <r>erbi<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>erbis</l>     <r>erbi<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>erbi</l>      <r>erbi<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>

<e lm="al·lergogen" a="eleka"><i>al·lerg</i><par n="ex/ogen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="assiri">          <i>ass</i><par n="ass/iri__adj"/></e>
<e lm="bifi">            <i>b</i><par n="b/ifi__adj"/></e>
<e lm="cefaloraquidi">   <i>cefaloraqu</i><par n="cefaloraqu/idi__adj"/></e>
<e lm="conspicu">        <i>consp</i><par n="consp/icu__adj"/></e>
<e lm="corinti">         <i>cor</i><par n="cor/inti__adj"/></e>
<e lm="epicuri" a="eleka"><i>epic</i><par n="esp/uri__adj"/></e>
<e lm="espuri">          <i>esp</i><par n="esp/uri__adj"/></e>
<e lm="exogen">          <i>ex</i><par n="ex/ogen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fitopatogen" a="prompsit2ua"><i>fitopat</i><par n="ex/ogen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="halogen">         <i>hal</i><par n="ex/ogen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="herbaci">         <i>herb</i><par n="herb/aci__adj"/></e>
<e lm="igni">            <par n="/igni__adj"/></e>
<e lm="petri">           <i>p</i><par n="p/etri__adj"/></e>
<e lm="patogen">         <i>pat</i><par n="ex/ogen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="promiscu">        <i>prom</i><par n="prom/iscu__adj"/></e>
<e lm="qualsevol">       <i>quals</i><par n="quals/evol__adj"/></e>
<e lm="serbi">           <i>s</i><par n="s/erbi__adj"/></e>
<e lm="siti">            <i>s</i><par n="s/iti__adj"/></e>
<e lm="superflu">        <i>sup</i><par n="sup/erflu__adj"/></e>
<e lm="taronja">         <i>taron</i><par n="taron/ja__adj"/></e>
<e lm="terraqüi">        <i>terr</i><par n="terr/aqüi__adj"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="inca">     <p><l><a/>in</l>    <r>in</r></p><par n="monar/ca__n"/></e>
<e lm="alumne">          <i>alumn</i><par n="addict/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="alumne">          <i>alumn</i><par n="addict/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="antropòleg" a="prompsit2adn"><i>antropòl</i><par n="biòl/eg__n"/></e>
<e lm="arquitecte">      <i>arquitect</i><par n="addict/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="asteca" a="prompsit2adn"><i>aste</i><par n="monar/ca__n"/></e>
<e lm="astròleg" a="mireiafarrus"><i>astròl</i><par n="biòl/eg__n"/></e>
<e lm="biòleg">          <i>biòl</i><par n="biòl/eg__n"/></e>
<e lm="bípede">          <i>bíped</i><par n="addict/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="cardiòleg" a="prompsit2adn"><i>cardiòl</i><par n="biòl/eg__n"/></e>
<e lm="càntabre" a="prompsit2adn"><i>càntabr</i><par n="addict/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="deixeble" a="prompsit2uoc"><i>deixebl</i><par n="addict/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="drogoaddicte">    <i>drogoaddict</i><par n="addict/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="egiptòleg" a="prompsit2uoc"><i>egiptòl</i><par n="biòl/eg__n"/></e>
<e lm="exministre" a="prompsit"><i>exministr</i><par n="addict/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="farmacòleg">      <i>farmacòl</i><par n="biòl/eg__n"/></e>
<e lm="fillastre" a="prompsit2uoc"><i>fillastr</i><par n="addict/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="foniatre">        <i>foniatr</i><par n="addict/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="fonòleg">         <i>fonòl</i><par n="biòl/eg__n"/></e>
<e lm="geriatre">        <i>geriatr</i><par n="addict/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="germanastre">     <i>germanastr</i><par n="addict/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="ginecòleg">       <i>ginecòl</i><par n="biòl/eg__n"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="inca">     <i>in</i><par n="monar/ca__n"/></e>
<e lm="mestre">          <i>mestr</i><par n="addict/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="mestre">          <i>mestr</i><par n="addict/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="meteoròleg" a="prompsit2adn"><i>meteoròl</i><par n="biòl/eg__n"/></e>
<e lm="ministre">        <i>ministr</i><par n="addict/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="monarca">         <i>monar</i><par n="monar/ca__n"/></e>
<e lm="museòleg" a="prompsit2ua"><i>museòl</i><par n="biòl/eg__n"/></e>
<e lm="negre">           <i>negr</i><par n="addict/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="odontòleg">       <i>odontòl</i><par n="biòl/eg__n"/></e>
<e lm="patriarca">       <i>patriar</i><par n="patriar/ca__n"/></e>
<e lm="prefecte" a="u21941"><i>prefect</i><par n="addict/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="psicòleg">        <i>psicòl</i><par n="biòl/eg__n"/></e>
<e lm="serbi">           <i>s</i><par n="s/erbi__n"/></e>
<e lm="semiòleg" a="prompsit2adn"><i>semiòl</i><par n="biòl/eg__n"/></e>
<e lm="sociòleg">        <i>sociòl</i><par n="biòl/eg__n"/></e>
<e lm="sogre">           <i>sogr</i><par n="addict/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="terminòleg" a="prompsit2ua"><i>terminòl</i><par n="biòl/eg__n"/></e>
<e lm="traumatòleg" a="prompsit2adn"><i>traumatòl</i><par n="biòl/eg__n"/></e>
<e lm="zoòleg">          <i>zoòl</i><par n="biòl/eg__n"/></e>
